Tennessee statutes. Title 61 Partnerships
Part 3

Limited Partners

61-2-301. Admission of limited partners.

In connection with the formation of a limited partnership, a person acquiring a partnership interest as a limited partner is admitted as a limited partner of the limited partnership upon the latter to occur of:

The formation of the limited partnership; or

The time provided in and upon compliance with the partnership agreement or, if the partnership agreement does not so provide, when the person's admission is reflected in the records of the limited partnership.

After the formation of a limited partnership, a person acquiring a partnership interest as a limited partner is admitted as a limited partner of the limited partnership:

In the case of a person acquiring a partnership interest directly from the limited partnership, at the time provided in and upon compliance with the partnership agreement or, if the partnership agreement does not so provide, upon the consent of all partners and when the person's admission is reflected in the records of the limited partnership; or

In the case of an assignee of a partnership interest, as provided in § 61-2-704 and at the time provided in and upon compliance with the partnership agreement or, if the partnership agreement does not so provide, when any such person's permitted admission is reflected in the records of the limited partnership.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; 1989, ch. 270, § 26.

61-2-302. Liability for obligations — Control of business.

Except as provided in subsection (d), a limited partner is not liable for the obligations of a limited partnership, unless he is also a general partner or, in addition to the exercise of his rights and powers as a limited partner, he participates in the control of the business. However, if the limited partner does participate in the control of the business, he is liable only to persons who transact business with the limited partnership reasonably believing, based upon the limited partner's conduct, that the limited partner is a general partner.

A limited partner does not participate in the control of the business within the meaning of subsection (a) by virtue of his possessing or exercising one (1) or more of the following powers or having or acting in one (1) or more of the following capacities:

To be an independent contractor for or to transact business with, including being a contractor for, or to be an agent or employee of, the limited partnership or a general partner, or to be an officer, director or stockholder of a corporate general partner, or to be a partner of a partnership that is a general partner of the limited partnership, or to be a fiduciary or beneficiary of an estate or trust which is a general partner;

To consult with or advise a general partner with respect to any matter, including the business of the limited partnership;

To act as surety, guarantor or endorser for the limited partnership or a general partner, to guarantee or assume one (1) or more obligations of the limited partnership or a general partner, to borrow money from the limited partnership or a general partner, to lend money to the limited partnership or a general partner, or to provide collateral for the limited partnership or a general partner;

To call, request or attend or participate at a meeting of the partners or the limited partners;

To wind up a limited partnership pursuant to § 61-2-803;

To take any action required or permitted by law to bring, pursue or settle or otherwise terminate a derivative action in the right of the limited partnership;

To serve on a committee of the limited partnership or the limited partners;

To act or cause the taking or refraining from the taking of any action, including by proposing, approving, consenting or disapproving, by voting or otherwise, with respect to one (1) or more of the following matters:

The dissolution and winding up of the limited partnership or an election to continue the limited partnership or an election to continue the business of the limited partnership;

The sale, exchange, lease, mortgage, assignment, pledge or other transfer of, or granting of a security interest in, any asset or assets of the limited partnership;

The incurrence, renewal, refinancing or payment or other discharge of indebtedness by the limited partnership;

A change in the nature of the business;

The admission, removal or retention of a general partner;

The admission, removal or retention of a limited partner;

A transaction or other matter involving an actual or potential conflict of interest;

An amendment to the partnership agreement or certificate of limited partnership;

The merger of a limited partnership;

In respect of a limited partnership which is registered as an investment company under the Investment Company Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. § 80a-1 et seq.), as amended, any matter required by the Investment Company Act of 1940, or the rules and regulations of the securities and exchange commission thereunder, to be approved by the holders of beneficial interests in an investment company, including the electing of directors or trustees of the investment company, the approving or terminating of investment advisory or underwriting contracts, and the approving of auditors;

The indemnification of any partner or other person; or

Such other matters as are stated in the partnership agreement or in any other agreement or in writing; or

Any right or power granted or permitted to limited partners under this chapter and not specifically enumerated in this subsection (b).

The enumeration in subsection (b) does not mean that the possession or exercise of any other powers or having or acting in other capacities by a limited partner constitutes participation by him in the control of the business of the limited partnership.

A limited partner does not participate in the control of the business within the meaning of subsection (a) by virtue of the fact that all or any part of the name of such limited partner is included in the name of the limited partnership.

This section does not create rights or powers of limited partners. Such rights and powers may be created only by a certificate of limited partnership, a partnership agreement or any other agreement, or other sections of this chapter.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; 1989, ch. 270, §§ 27-37.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act (Glenn Stophel and James C. Heartfield), 26 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 22 (1990).

61-2-303. Person believed to be limited partner.

Except as provided in subsection (b), a person who makes a contribution to a partnership and erroneously but in good faith believes that he has become a limited partner in the partnership is not a general partner in the partnership and is not bound by its obligations by reason of making the contribution, receiving distributions from the partnership or exercising any rights of a limited partner, if, within a reasonable time after ascertaining the mistake:

In the case of a person who wishes to be a limited partner, he causes, if applicable, a certificate of amendment withdrawing him as a general partner to be executed and filed with the office of the secretary of state and has his interest as a limited partner properly recorded, in the limited partnership's records as required by law and the partnership agreement;

In the case of a person who wishes to withdraw from the partnership, he takes such action as may be necessary to withdraw.

A person who makes a contribution under the circumstances described in subsection (a) is liable as a general partner to any third party who transacts business with the partnership prior to the occurrence of either of the events referred to in subsection (a):

If such person knew or should have known either that no certificate has been filed or that the certificate inaccurately refers to him as a general partner; and

If the third party actually believed in good faith that such person was a general partner at the time of the transaction, acted in reasonable reliance on such belief and extended credit to the partnership in reasonable reliance on the credit of such person.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; 1989, ch. 270, § 38.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act (Glenn Stophel and James C. Heartfield), 26 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 22 (1990).

61-2-304. Right to information.

Any person shall have the right to examine the current list of the names and addresses of all general and limited partners of any partnership formed under this chapter at the registered office of the partnership during reasonable business hours, and, upon payment of reasonable costs of duplication, to make a copy thereof.

Each limited partner has the right, subject to such reasonable standards (including standards governing what information and documents are to be furnished, at what time and location and at whose expense) as may be set forth in the partnership agreement or otherwise established by the general partners, to obtain from the general partners, from time to time, upon reasonable demand for any purpose reasonably related to the limited partner's interest as a limited partner:

True and full information regarding the status of the business and financial condition of the limited partnership;

Promptly after becoming available, a copy of the limited partnership's federal, state and local income tax returns for each year;

A current list of the name and last known business, residence or mailing address of each partner;

A copy of any written partnership agreement and certificate of limited partnership and all amendments thereto, together with executed copies of any written powers of attorney pursuant to which the partnership agreement and any certificate and all amendments thereto have been executed;

True and full information regarding the amount of cash and a description and statement of the agreed value of any other property or services contributed by each partner and which each partner has agreed to contribute in the future, and the date on which each became a partner; and

Other information regarding the affairs of the limited partnership as is just and reasonable.

A general partner shall have the right to keep confidential from limited partners for such period of time as the general partner deems reasonable, any information which the general partner reasonably believes to be in the nature of trade secrets or other information the disclosure of which the general partner in good faith believes is not in the best interest of the limited partnership or could damage the limited partnership or its business or which the limited partnership is required by law or by agreement with a third party to keep confidential.

A limited partnership may maintain its records in other than a written form if such form is capable of conversion into written form within a reasonable time.

Any demand under this section shall be in writing and shall state the purpose of such demand.

Any action to enforce any right arising under this section shall be brought in a court of record.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; 1989, ch. 270, § 39.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act (Glenn Stophel and James C. Heartfield), 26 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 22 (1990).